Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3209] Professional student
exchange program; repayment policy. The Hawaii commission may establish a
repayment policy for students who receive any financial support from funds
appropriated by the legislature for the Hawaii professional student exchange
program of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education. [L 2012, c
137, pt of §1]

Cross References

Professional student exchange program special fund, see §304A-2179.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next